Oklahoma, session 2025, SB781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Earned


Wages Access Services Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:

Req. No. 784 Page 1


1. “Consumer” means an individual who resides in Oklahoma;


2. “Consumer-directed wage access service” means delivering to


a consumer access to earned but unpaid income that is based on the


consumer’s representations and the provider’s reasonable


determination of the consumer’s earned but unpaid income;


3. “Earned but unpaid income” means salary, wages,


compensation, or other income that a consumer or an employer has


represented and that a provider has reasonably determined has been


earned or accrued to the benefit of the consumer in exchange for the


consumer’s provision of services to the employer or on behalf of the


employer including on an hourly, project-based, piecework, or other


basis. Earned but unpaid income shall include income earned under


circumstances in which the consumer is acting as an independent


contractor of the employer but has not, at the time of the payment


of proceeds, been paid by the employer;


4. “Earned wage access services” means services providing


consumer-directed wage access services or employer-integrated wage


access services;


5. “Earned wage access services provider” or “provider”:


a. means a person that is in the business of providing


earned wage access services to consumers, and


b. does not mean a service provider, such as a payroll


service provider, whose role may include verifying the


available earnings but is not contractually obligated

Req. No. 784 Page 2


to fund any proceeds delivered as part of an earned


wage access service, or an employer that offers a


portion of salary, wages, or compensation directly to


its employees or independent contractors before the


normally scheduled pay date;


6. “Employer”:


a. means a person who employs a consumer, or any other


person who is contractually obligated to pay a


consumer in exchange for the consumer’s provision of


services to the employer or on behalf of the employer


including on an hourly, project-based, piecework, or


other basis and including circumstances in which the


consumer is acting as an independent contractor with


respect to the employer, and


b. does not mean a customer of an employer, or any other


person whose obligation to make a payment of salary,


wages, compensation, or other income to a consumer is


not based on the provision of services by that


consumer for or on behalf of the person;


7. “Employer-based integrated wage access services” means


delivering to a consumer access to earned but unpaid income that is


based on employment, income, or attendance data obtained directly or


indirectly from an employer’s payroll service provider;


8. “Fee”:

Req. No. 784 Page 3


a. means a fee imposed by a provider for delivery or


expedited delivery of proceeds to a consumer, or a


subscription or membership fee imposed by a provider


for a bona fide group of services that includes earned


wage access services, and


b. does not mean a voluntary tip, gratuity, or other


donation;


9. “Proceeds” means a payment to a consumer by a provider that


is based on earned but unpaid income; and


10. “Outstanding proceeds” means proceeds remitted to a


consumer by a provider that have not yet been repaid to the


provider.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.2 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An earned wage access services provider shall:


1. Develop and implement policies and procedures to respond to


questions raised by consumers and address complaints from consumers


in an expedient manner;


2. When a consumer is offered the option to receive proceeds


for a fee or solicits an optional tip, gratuity, or other donation,


offer the consumer at least one reasonable option to obtain proceeds


at no cost to the consumer and clearly explain how to elect the no-


cost option;

Req. No. 784 Page 4


3. Before entering into an agreement with a consumer for the


provision of earned wage access services, adhere to the following:


a. inform the consumer of his or her rights under the


agreement, and


b. fully and clearly disclose all fees associated with


the earned wage access services;


4. Inform the consumer of any material changes to the terms and


conditions of the earned wage access services before implementing


those changes for that consumer;


5. Allow the consumer to cancel use of the provider’s earned


wage access services at any time, without incurring a cancellation


fee imposed by the provider;


6. Comply with all applicable local, state, and federal privacy


and information security laws;


7. If a provider solicits charges or receives a tip, gratuity,


or other donation from a consumer, disclose clearly and


conspicuously to the consumer:


a. immediately prior to each transaction that a tip,


gratuity, or other donation amount may be zero and is


voluntary, and


b. in the provider service contract with the consumer and


elsewhere that tips, gratuities, or other donations


are voluntary and that the offering of earned wage


access services, including the amount of proceeds a

Req. No. 784 Page 5


consumer is eligible to request and the frequency with


which proceeds are provided to a consumer, is not


contingent on whether the consumer pays, or on the


size of any tips, gratuities, or other donations; and


8. Provide proceeds to a consumer by any means mutually agreed


upon by the consumer and the provider.


B. If the provider seeks repayment of outstanding proceeds or


payment of fees or other amounts owed, including voluntary tips,


gratuities, or other donations, in connection with the activities


covered by this act, from a consumer’s account at a depository


institution, including by means of electronic funds transfer, the


provider shall:


1. Comply with applicable provisions of the federal Electronic


Fund Transfer Act and regulations adopted thereunder; and


2. Reimburse the consumer for the full amount of any overdraft


or insufficient funds or fees imposed on a consumer by the


consumer’s depository institution that were caused by the provider


attempting to seek payment of any outstanding proceeds, fees, or


other payments, in connection with the activities covered by this


chapter, including voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations,


on a date before, or in an incorrect amount from, the date or amount


disclosed to the consumer.





Req. No. 784 Page 6


C. Nothing in this act shall require a provider to be subject


to payments of outstanding proceeds or fees, if they were incurred


by a consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful means.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.3 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An earned wage access services provider shall not:


1. Share with an employer a portion of any fees, voluntary


tips, gratuities, or other donations that were received from or


charged to a consumer for earned wage access services;


2. Require a consumer’s credit report or a credit score


provided or issued by a consumer reporting agency to determine a


consumer’s eligibility for earned wage access services;


3. Accept payment of outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary


tips, gratuities, or other donations from a consumer by means of


credit card or charge card;


4. Charge a consumer a late fee, deferral fee, interest, or any


other penalty or charge for failure to pay outstanding proceeds,


fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations;


5. Report to a consumer reporting agency or debt collector any


information about the consumer regarding the inability of the


provider to be repaid outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary tips,


gratuities, or other donations;



Req. No. 784 Page 7


6. Compel or attempt to compel payment by a consumer of


outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other


donations to the provider through any of the following:


a. a suit against the consumer in a court of competent


jurisdiction,


b. use of a third party to pursue collection from the


consumer on the provider’s behalf, or


c. sale of outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary tips,


gratuities, or other donations to a third-party


collector or debt buyer for collection from a


consumer; and


7. Mislead or deceive a consumer about the voluntary nature of


the tips, gratuities, or donations or represent that they will


benefit any specific individuals or group of individuals.


B. The limitations set forth in this section do not preclude


the use by a provider of any of the methods specified in paragraph 6


of subsection A of this section to compel payment of outstanding


proceeds or fees incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or


unlawful means; nor do they preclude a provider from pursuing an


employer for breach of its contractual obligations to the provider.


C. A provider may use the mailing address or state of residence


provided to it by a person or that person’s employer to determine


the person’s state of residence for purposes of this act.



Req. No. 784 Page 8


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.4 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall not apply to any person doing business under


the authority of any law of this state or of the United States


relating to banks, savings institutions, trust companies, building


and loan associations, industrial loan associations, or credit


unions.


B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, earned wage


access services offered and provided by an earned wage access


services provider in accordance with this act shall not be


considered:


1. In violation of or noncompliance with any law governing


deductions from payroll, salary, wages, compensation, or other


income or the purchase, sale, or assignment of, or an order for,


earned but unpaid income;


2. A loan or other form of credit or debt; nor shall the


provider be considered a creditor, debt collector, or lender with


respect thereto; or


3. A money transmission; nor shall the provider be considered a


money transmitter with respect thereto.


C. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, fees, voluntary


tips, gratuities, or other donations paid in accordance with this



Req. No. 784 Page 9


act to a provider shall not be considered interest or finance


charges.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-784 MR 1/19/2025 5:43:12 AM







































Req. No. 784 Page 10